Utah statutes.
7-9-48.   Disclosure of share and deposit insurance -- Disclosure if secured through securities.

(1)  A credit union shall comply with all share and deposit insurance disclosure requirements of the National Credit Union Administration or its successor agency.

(2)  In addition to the disclosure requirements described in Subsection (1), a credit union that in accordance with Subsection 7-9-45(2) is not insured by the National Credit Union Administration or successor federal deposit insurance agency shall provide, as prescribed by rule or order, notice that deposits and shares in the credit union are not insured by a federal deposit insurance agency.

